nb: Berøringsskjermtråd-konfigurasjon: 2-tråds; 4-tråds; 5-tråds; 8-tråds; Annet
fr: Configuration des fils de l’écran tactile: 2 fils; 4 fils; 5 fils; 8 fils; Autre
ja: タッチスクリーンワイヤー構成: 2線式; 4線式; 5線式; 8線式; その他
pt-PT: Configuração de fios do ecrã tátil: 2 fios; 4 fios; 5 fios; 8 fios; Outro
ko: 터치스크린 와이어 구성: 2선; 4선; 5선; 8선; 기타
pl: Konfiguracja przewodów ekranu dotykowego: 2-przewodowa; 4-przewodowa; 5-przewodowa; 8-przewodowa; Inne
ru: Конфигурация проводов сенсорного экрана: 2-проводная; 4-проводная; 5-проводная; 8-проводная; Другой
fi: Kosketusnäytön johtokonfiguraatio: 2-johtoinen; 4-johtoinen; 5-johtoinen; 8-johtoinen; Muu
sk-SK: Konfigurácia káblov dotykovej obrazovky: 2-vodičový; 4-vodičový; 5-vodičový; 8-vodičový; Iné
el: Διαμόρφωση καλωδίων οθόνης αφής: 2 καλωδίων; 4 καλωδίων; 5 καλωδίων; 8 καλωδίων; Άλλο
tr: Dokunmatik ekran tel konfigürasyonu: 2 telli; 4 telli; 5 telli; 8 telli; Diğer
da: Touchskærmens ledningskonfiguration: 2-tråd; 4-tråd; 5-tråd; 8-tråd; Andet
hr-HR: Konfiguracija žica zaslona osjetljivog na dodir: 2-žilni; 4-žilni; 5-žilni; 8-žilni; Ostalo
en: Touchscreen wire configuration: 2-wire; 4-wire; 5-wire; 8-wire; Other
nl: Draadconfiguratie touchscreen: 2-draads; 4-draads; 5-draads; 8-draads; Andere
bg-BG: Конфигурация на проводниците на сензорния екран: 2-проводен; 4-проводен; 5-проводен; 8-проводен; Други
ro-RO: Configurație fire ecran tactil: 2 fire; 4 fire; 5 fire; 8 fire; Altele
vi: Cấu hình dây màn hình cảm ứng: 2 dây; 4 dây; 5 dây; 8 dây; Khác
lt-LT: Jutiklinio ekrano laidų konfigūracija: 2 laidų; 4 laidų; 5 laidų; 8 laidų; Kita
it: Configurazione dei fili del touchscreen: 2 fili; 4 fili; 5 fili; 8 fili; Altro
sl-SI: Konfiguracija žic zaslona na dotik: 2-žična; 4-žična; 5-žična; 8-žična; Drugo
zh-CN: 触摸屏线路配置: 2 线; 4 线; 5 线; 8 线; 其他
es: Configuración de cables de la pantalla táctil: 2 cables; 4 cables; 5 cables; 8 cables; Otros
cs: Konfigurace drátů dotykové obrazovky: 2vodičový; 4vodičový; 5vodičový; 8vodičový; Jiné
zh-TW: 觸控螢幕線路配置: 2 線式; 4 線式; 5 線式; 8 線式; 其他
pt-BR: Configuração de fios da tela sensível ao toque: 2 fios; 4 fios; 5 fios; 8 fios; Outro
sv: Pekskärmens trådkonfiguration: 2-tråd; 4-tråd; 5-tråd; 8-tråd; Övrigt
de: Touchscreen-Drahtkonfiguration: 2-adrig; 4-adrig; 5-adrig; 8-adrig; Sonstiges
th: การกำหนดค่าสายหน้าจอสัมผัส: 2 สาย; 4 สาย; 5 สาย; 8 สาย; อื่นๆ
hu: Érintőképernyő vezeték konfigurációja: 2 vezetékes; 4 vezetékes; 5 vezetékes; 8 vezetékes; Egyéb